Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.041

High school directory information—Data-sharing agreements with the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(1) The Washington student achievement council and institutions of higher education must enter into data-sharing agreements with the office of the superintendent of public instruction to facilitate the transfer of high school student directory information collected under RCW 28A.150.515 for the purposes of informing Washington high school students of postsecondary financial aid and educational opportunities available in the state.

(2) Data-sharing agreements entered into under this section must provide for the education research and data center to share student enrollment and outcome information from institutions of higher education, including federally designated minority serving institutions of higher education that are participating in data-sharing agreements under subsection (4) of this section, to the office of the superintendent of public instruction. Information provided in accordance with this subsection (2) must include the statewide student identifier for each student. To the extent possible, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall transmit student enrollment information to the enrolled students' host districts for the current year.

(3)(a) Data-sharing agreements entered into by a community college or technical college as defined in RCW 28B.50.030 are limited to informing Washington high school students of postsecondary educational opportunities available within a college's service district as enumerated in RCW 28B.50.040.

(b) The state board for community and technical colleges may coordinate with all of the community and technical colleges to develop a single data-sharing agreement between the community and technical colleges and the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(4) Federally designated minority-serving institutions of higher education that are bachelor degree-granting institutions and not subject to subsection (1) of this section may enter into data-sharing agreements with the office of the superintendent of public instruction to facilitate the transfer of high school student directory information collected under RCW 28A.150.515 for the purpose of informing Washington high school students of postsecondary educational opportunities available in the state.

(5) Agreements entered into under this section must obligate the Washington student achievement council and institutions that will receive information through an agreement to maintain the statewide student identifier for each student.

(6) For the purposes of this section, "statewide student identifier" means the statewide student identifier required by RCW 28A.320.175 that is included in the longitudinal student data system established under RCW 28A.300.500.

(7) For the purposes of this section, "directory information" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.150.515.

[ 2024 c 324 s 1; 2023 c 406 s 1.]